test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_kaavpug_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - kaavpug: #
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: kaˊvpugân
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: kaˊvpugist
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: kaˊvpugáin
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: kaavpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: kaˊvpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: kaˊvpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: kaˊvpugeh
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: kaˊvpugij
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: kaˊvpugijd
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: kaˊvpugáid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: kaˊvpugijn
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: kaˊvpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊvpugijttáá
